Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB41.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1606-A. Playoffs and Championships.-- (a) The association may establish separate playoffs and championships for athletics for boundary schools and nonboundary schools.(b) (1) Prior to establishing separate playoffs and championships for athletics under subsection (a), the board and the oversight committee shall conduct at least one joint meeting in each of the districts that comprise the association.123456789101112131415161718 (2) The meetings shall be open to the public in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. § 704 (relating to open meetings).(3) Notice of each meeting shall be given in compliance with 65 Pa.C.S. § 709 (relating to public notice).(4) Minutes of the proceedings of each meeting shall be kept in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. § 706 (relating to minutes of meetings, public records and recording of meetings).(5) The board and oversight committee shall accept sworn testimony and comments from individuals relating to whether playoffs should or should not be separated for all or certain athletics for boundary and nonboundary schools. The board and the oversight committee may accept written testimony during each meeting and comments through electronic submission, which must be submitted no later than ten (10) days after the last scheduled public meeting.(c) (1) No later than ten (10) days after the meetings in subsection (b) are complete, the board shall hold an open meeting pursuant to 65 Pa.C.S. § 704 to deliberate the establishment of separate playoffs and championships for athletics for boundary and nonboundary schools.(2) At the open meetings, the board shall discuss all of the following:(i) Whether the association will require that all sports, certain sports or no sports conduct separate playoffs and championships for boundary and nonboundary schools.(ii) If a determination is made that separate playoffs and championships will be required, the board shall discuss the fiscal impact the requirement may or may not have on boundary and nonboundary schools.(iii) All relevant testimony and comments provided during 20250HB0041PN3295 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the district hearings that provide rationale in support or opposition to separate playoffs and championships for boundary and nonboundary schools.(3) The board shall reserve time for public comments from individuals in attendance at the meeting before rendering a final decision.(4) After the public comment period in paragraph (3) has closed, the board shall recess to executive session to deliberate the following options:(i) returning to the public meeting to hold a vote to alter playoffs and championships for all sports;(ii) returning to the public meeting to hold a vote to alter playoffs and championships for certain sports; or(iii) returning to the public meeting to make a statement and justify why no changes are being made to playoffs and championships for any sports.(5) Once the board selects an option under paragraph (4), the public meeting shall resume and the chosen option shall be implemented.(6) ONCE THE BOARD CHOOSES AN OPTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (4), NO CAUSE OF ACTION OR REQUEST FOR RELIEF SHALL LIE AGAINST THE ASSOCIATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A).(d) No later than five (5) days after the meeting in subsection (c), the association shall provide its decision in writing to the oversight committee along with the reasoning behind the decision.(e) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Executive Board of the Pennsylvania 20250HB0041PN3295 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Interscholastic Athletic Association."Boundary school." A public school. The term does not include a charter school."Nonboundary school." A charter school, a parochial school or a private school."Oversight committee." The Pennsylvania Athletic Oversight Committee established in section 1605-A.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0041PN3295 - 4 - 12345678